Wisconsin, session 2025, SB660.
do enact as follows:SB660,13Section 1. 84.01 (39) of the statutes is created to read:SB660,1,4484.01 (39) Aggressive driving reduction campaign. (a) In this subsection:SB660,1,551. “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county.SB660,2,212. “Subject audience” means individuals at high risk of engaging in conduct 2described in par. (b).SB660,2,63(b) Subject to par. (c), the department shall conduct a public information 4campaign designed to reduce the incidence of excessive speeding, illegal racing, 5illegal fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officers, and other aggressive 6driving behaviors.SB660,2,87(c) The department shall do all of the following with regard to the public 8information campaign under par. (b):SB660,2,1091. Ensure that the campaign runs for not less than one year nor more than 2 10years.SB660,2,14112. Prioritize engagement in political subdivisions in which incidents of 12excessive speeding, illegal racing, illegal fleeing or attempting to elude law 13enforcement officers, and other aggressive driving behaviors are the highest, as 14determined by the department.SB660,2,15153. Make use of billboard, radio, television, and digital advertising.SB660,2,20164. For each political subdivision in which the campaign runs, to the extent 17feasible, prioritize contracting with creative agencies, nonprofit organizations, and 18media firms with principal places of business in the political subdivision or an 19immediately adjacent political subdivision to create and distribute campaign 20materials.SB660,2,24215. Prioritize featuring stories from individuals affected by the conduct 22described in par. (b), including young drivers, law enforcement officers, and 23individuals and family members of individuals who were injured because of conduct 24described in par. (b).SB660,3,516. Attempt to influence the subject audience. In satisfying this subdivision, 2the department shall prioritize partnering with persons and organizations likely to 3influence the subject audience, including barbershops, schools, churches, 4community organizations, and media influencers, and shall prioritize the use of 5materials that reflect the experiences and background of the subject audience.SB660,3,86(d) The department may combine the public information campaign under par. 7(b) with any other public information campaign in which the department 8participates.SB660,3,109(e) In the 2025-27 fiscal biennium, the department shall expend not less than 10$500,000 on the public information campaign under par. (b).SB660,211Section 2. Fiscal changes.SB660,3,1712(1) In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 13of transportation under s. 20.395 (5) (dr), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 14is increased by $250,000 for the public information campaign under s. 84.01 (39). In 15the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of 16transportation under s. 20.395 (5) (dr), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is 17increased by $250,000 for the public information campaign under s. 84.01 (39).SB660,3,1818